Utah statutes.
19-8-103.   Creation of restricted account -- Purposes.
(1)  There is created within the General Fund the Environmental Voluntary
Cleanup restricted account.
(2)  The account shall be used to fund department administration and oversight
of voluntary cleanups initiated under this chapter.
(3)  The account may earn interest, which shall be deposited in the account,
to be used for the purposes under this section.
